Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-7010
Breast and Cervical Cancer Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Breast and Cervical Cancer Cash Fund is created. The fund shall consist of any money transferred to it by the Legislature, any money received by the department for the program, including federal and other public and private funds, and funds credited under section 71-7003.01. Money in the fund may be used to reimburse expenses of the program for early detection of breast and cervical cancer funded through a grant from the United States Department of Health and Human Services and funds received under section 71-7003.01. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1991, LB 256, § 10;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 71;

Laws 1995, LB 68, § 9;

Laws 2008, LB797, § 24;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 28.
July 1, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.